District of Columbia statutes.
25-409

Application for importation permit.

The application for issuance or renewal of a importation permit shall include:

(1)

The quantity, character, and brand or trade name of the alcoholic beverage to be transported; and

(2)

The name and address of the retailer.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959